Idaho, session 2025, S1211.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 37, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 37-135, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
37-135. IVERMECTIN WITHOUT PRESCRIPTION OR CONSULTATION WITH HEALTH
CARE PROFESSIONAL. (1) As used in this section, "over-the-counter medica-
tion" means medication that may be legally sold and purchased without a pre-
scription.
(2) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, ivermectin suitable for
human use may be sold or purchased as an over-the-counter medication in this
state without a prescription or consultation with a health care profes-
sional.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.